Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1247
Federal boating laws or coast guard regulations; pilot rules; commission; option to adopt.

The commission is hereby authorized to establish and maintain, for the operation of vessels on the waters of this state, pilot rules in conformity with the pilot rules contained in the federal boating laws or the boating regulations promulgated by the United States Coast Guard.

Laws 1978, LB 21, § 46.